District of Columbia statutes.
44-1004.01

Injunctive relief.

A resident, a resident’s representative, the Long-Term Care Ombudsman, or the Attorney General for the District of Columbia may bring an action in court for a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to enjoin a facility from violating any provision in subchapter III of this chapter, any rule issued by the Mayor pursuant to that subchapter, or any standard or resident’s right established pursuant to § 44-504(a)(3) and (4).

History

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 401, 33 DCR 1510
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 67, 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1451.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.